Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-118 Record of officials. Within
thirty days after election or appointment, a record of the names and addresses
of the members of the board and such other committees and officers, as required
by the commissioner, shall be filed with the division of financial
institutions. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next